Nevada, session 83, AB583.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. For the purposes of NRS 287.044 and
287.0445, the State’s share of the cost of premiums or contributions
for group insurance for each active state officer or employee who
elects to participate in the Public Employees’ Benefits Program is:
(a) For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $991 per month.
(b) For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027, $943 per month.
2. If the amount of the State’s share pursuant to this section
exceeds the actual premium or contribution for the plan of the
Public Employees’ Benefits Program that the state officer or
employee selects, less any amount paid by the state officer or
employee toward the premium or contribution, the balance must be
credited to the Fund for the Public Employees’ Benefits Program
created by NRS 287.0435, which may be used to pay a portion of
the premiums or contributions for persons who are eligible to
participate in the Public Employees’ Benefits Program through such
a state officer or employee.
Sec. 2. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, for
the purposes of NRS 287.023 and 287.046, the base amount for the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
share of the cost of premiums or contributions for group insurance
for each person who has retired with state service and continues to
participate in the Public Employees’ Benefits Program to be paid by
the State or a local government, as applicable, is:
(a) For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $650 per month.
(b) For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027, $700 per month.
2. For the purposes of NRS 287.023 and 287.046, the share of
the cost of qualified medical expenses for each person who has
retired with state service and whose coverage is provided through
the Public Employees’ Benefits Program by an individual medical
plan offered pursuant to the Health Insurance for the Aged Act, 42
U.S.C. §§ 1395 et seq., for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year
2026-2027 to be paid by the State or a local government, as
applicable, is:
(a) For those persons who retired before January 1, 1994:
(1) For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $195 per month.
(2) For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027, $195 per month.
(b) For those persons who retired on or after January 1, 1994:
(1) For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $13 per month per year of
service, up to 20 years, excluding service purchased pursuant to
NRS 1A.310 or 286.300, up to a maximum of $260 per month.
(2) For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027, $13 per month per year of
service, up to 20 years, excluding service purchased pursuant to
NRS 1A.310 or 286.300, up to a maximum of $260 per month.
3. If the amount calculated pursuant to this section exceeds the
actual premium or contribution for the plan of the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program that the retired participant selects, the
balance must be credited to the Fund for the Public Employees’
Benefits Program created by NRS 287.0435.
Sec. 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430 and
218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the expiration of
the period prescribed for the return of a fiscal note in NRS
218D.475. This section applies retroactively from and after May 2,
2025.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)